Utah statutes.
76-10-807.   Violation of order enjoining a public nuisance.

A person who knowingly violates any judgment or order abating or otherwise enjoining a public nuisance as defined under Section 76-10-803 is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.



Enacted by Chapter 99, 2010 General Session

